Idaho statutes. Title 66 STATE CHARITABLE INSTITUTIONS
Chapter 9
IDAHO VETERANS’ HOME

Sec.

§ 66-901. Establishment of homes.

On and after July 1, 2000, there shall be established in the division of veterans services in the department of self-governing agencies in this state homes for veterans which shall hereafter be known and designated as Idaho state veterans homes. Idaho state veterans homes shall be homes for veterans discharged under honorable conditions by the government of the United States and the spouses of veterans eligible for admission to an Idaho state veterans home. A “spouse” shall mean the current husband or wife of a veteran under a marriage recognized by title 32, Idaho Code, and, as allowed by admissions criteria established pursuant to section 66-907, Idaho Code, the widow or widower of a veteran under a marriage recognized by title 32, Idaho Code. Before a person is admitted to a home, that person shall be a bona fide resident of this state.

§ 66-902, 66-903. Commandant — Physician and matron. [Repealed.]

§ 66-904. Inspection of homes.

The veterans homes shall be subject to inspection at any time by the governor or any officer of his staff designated by him for the purpose of making such inspection.

§ 66-905. Uniforms. [Repealed.]

§ 66-906. Succession to property of deceased resident.

Hereafter, the application of any person for membership in a veterans home of this state, and the admission of the applicant thereunder shall be and constitute a valid and binding contract between such applicant and the administrator of the division of veterans services in the department of self-governing agencies of the state of Idaho that on the death of said applicant, while a member of such home, leaving no heirs at law next of kin, all personal property owned by said applicant at the time of his death, including money or choses in action held by him and not disposed of by will, whether such property be the proceeds of pensions or otherwise derived, shall vest in and become the property of said division of veterans services in the department of self-governing agencies of the state of Idaho for the sole use and benefit of said home, the proceeds to be disposed of in such manner as may be ordered by the administrator of the division, and that all personal property of said applicant which, upon his death, while a member, shall at once pass to and vest in said administrator, subject to be reclaimed by any legatee or person entitled to take the same by inheritance at any time within five (5) years after the death of such member. The administrator of the division of veterans services is directed to so change the form of application for membership as to give reasonable notice of this provision to each applicant, and as to contain the consent of the applicant to accept membership upon the conditions herein provided.

§ 66-907. Admissions to and charges for residence at homes.

The administrator of the division of veterans services in the department of self-governing agencies with the advice of the veterans affairs commission is hereby authorized and directed to establish appropriate admissions criteria for the homes and to establish charges for residence in those cases where residents have available resources for this purpose.

§ 66-908. Receipt of resident funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the administrator of the division of veterans services or his designee may be appointed by the paying entity as a payee, fiduciary or other agent for the purposes of receiving funds payable to a resident of a veterans home of this state. Prior to appointing the administrator as a recipient of resident funds, the paying entity shall conduct its customary process for determining the need for the appointment and conclude that the appointment of the administrator complies with the laws, policies and procedures applicable to the paying entity. The administrator shall provide the resident with notice and an opportunity to appeal the appointment before accepting appointment as a recipient of the resident’s funds. The process for appeal of the appointment shall be set forth in rules promulgated by the administrator.

All moneys received pursuant to this section shall be kept by the administrator in trust for the benefit of the resident. The administrator may apply any portion of the funds held in trust to the expenses of the resident arising from residence at a veterans home. The administrator may apply funds not required for the expenses arising from residence at a veterans home to payment for other reasonable expenses of the resident.

The administrator shall maintain an accounting of the funds received and distributed under this section. A copy of the accounting shall be available to the resident and to other parties designated by the resident.

Upon a resident’s discharge from a veterans home and the payment of all outstanding expenses of the resident known to the administrator, the administrator shall distribute funds held on behalf of the resident under this section to the resident or to his designee.